es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Caza y tiro > Airsoft: Granadas de airsoft; Accesorios y piezas para pistolas de airsoft; Pistolas de airsoft; Bolas de airsoft; Equipamiento de protección para Airsoft; Dianas de airsoft
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Poľovníctvo a streľba > Airsoft: Airsoftové granáty; Diely a príslušenstvo pre airsoftové zbrane; Airsoftové zbrane; Airsoftové pelety; Airsoftové ochranné vybavenie; Airsoftové terče
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Κυνήγι & σκοποβολή > Airsoft: Χειροβομβίδες Airsoft; Εξαρτήματα & αξεσουάρ όπλων για Airsoft; Όπλα Airsoft; Σφαίρες για όπλα Airsoft; Προστατευτικός εξοπλισμός Airsoft; Στόχοι Airsoft
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Jakt og skyting > Luftpistol: Airsoftgranater; Deler og tilbehør for luftpistoler; Luftpistoler; Luftpistolkuler; Beskyttelsesutstyr til airsoft; Airsoftblinker
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Jagen und Schießen > Softair: Airsoft-Granaten; Softairwaffen-Teile & -Zubehör; Softairwaffen; Softairkugeln; Airsoft-Schutzkleidung; Airsoft-Ziele
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Jagen en schieten > Airsoft: Airsoftgranaten; Onderdelen en accessoires voor airsoftgeweren; Airsoftgeweren; Airsoftballetjes; Beschermende uitrusting voor airsoft; Airsoftdoelen
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Vânătoare și tir > Aer comprimat: Grenade airsoft; Piese și accesorii pentru arme cu aer comprimat; Arme cu aer comprimat; Pelete pentru arme cu aer comprimat; Echipamente de protecție pentru tir cu arme cu aer comprimat; Ținte airsoft
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Myślistwo i strzelectwo > ASG: Granaty ASG; Akcesoria do ASG; Broń ASG; Kulki ASG; Sprzęt ochronny do ASG; Tarcze do ASG
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Lov a střelba > Airsoft: Airsoftové granáty; Příslušenství a díly pro zbraně na airsoft; Zbraně na airsoft; Kuličky na airsoft; Airsoftové chrániče; Airsoftové terče
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Jakt och skytte > Airsoft: Airsoftgranater; Delar och tillbehör till airsoftvapen; Airsoftvapen; Airsoftkulor; Skyddsutrustning för airsoft; Airsoftmåltavlor
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Metsästys ja ammunta > Airsoft: Airsoft-kranaatit; Airsoft-aseiden osat ja tarvikkeet; Airsoft-aseet; Airsoft-kuulat; Airsoft-suojavarusteet; Airsoft-maalitaulut
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 打獵和射擊 > 生存遊戲: 軟氣手榴彈; 軟氣槍零件/配件; 軟氣槍隻; 軟氣槍子彈; 軟彈氣槍護具; 軟氣槍標靶
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Chasse et tir > Airsoft: Grenades d’airsoft; Pièces et accessoires pour armes d'airsoft; Armes d'airsoft; Billes d'airsoft; Équipements de protection pour airsoft; Cibles d’airsoft
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Medžioklė ir šaudymas > Šratasvydis: „Airsoft“ granatos; Šratasvydžio ginklų dalys ir priedai; Šratasvydžio ginklai; Šratasvydžio šratai; Šratasvydžio apsauginės priemonės; „Airsoft“ taikiniai
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Vadászat és lövészet > Airsoft: Airsoft gránátok; Airsoft-fegyveralkatrészek és -kiegészítők; Airsoft fegyverek; Airsoft pelletek; Airsoft védőfelszerelés; Airsoft célpontok
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Avcılık ve Atıcılık > Airsoft: Airsoft bombaları; Airsoft Tüfek Parçaları ve Aksesuarları; Airsoft Tüfekleri; Airsoft Mermileri; Airsoft Koruyucu Kıyafetleri; Airsoft hedefleri
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Lov i streljaštvo > Airsoft: Airsoft granate; Dijelovi i dodaci za airsoft puške; Airsoft puške; Airsoft kuglice; Zaštitna oprema za airsoft; Mete za airsoft
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > การล่าสัตว์และยิงปืน > แอร์ซอฟท์: ระเบิดแอร์ซอฟต์; ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์ปืนแอร์ซอฟท์; ปืนแอร์ซอฟท์; ลูกแอร์ซอฟท์; อุปกรณ์ป้องกันปืนแอร์ซอฟท์; เป้าแอร์ซอฟต์
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Лов и стрелба > Страйкбол: Гранати за страйкбол; Части и аксесоари за пистолети за страйкбол; Оръжия за страйкбол; Топчета за страйкбол; Защитна екипировка за страйкбол; Мишени за страйкбол
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 사냥/사격 > 에어소프트: 에어소프트 수류탄; 에어소프트 건 부품/부대용품; 에어소프트건; 에어소프트 총알; 에어소프트 보호 장비; 에어소프트 타겟
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Lov in streljanje > Airsoft: Airsoft granate; Deli in dodatki za airsoft puške; Airsoft puške; Airsoft kroglice; Zaščitna oprema za airsoft; Airsoft tarče
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Caça e tiro > Airsoft: Granadas de airsoft; Acessórios e peças para réplicas de airsoft; Réplicas de airsoft; BBs para airsoft; Equipamento de proteção para airsoft; Alvos de airsoft
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > 狩猟・射撃 > エアソフト用品: エアソフトグレネード; エアソフトガン関連用品; エアソフトガン; エアソフトガン用BB弾; エアソフト用プロテクター; エアソフト用ターゲット
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Hunting & Shooting > Airsoft: Airsoft Grenades; Airsoft Gun Parts & Accessories; Airsoft Guns; Airsoft Pellets; Airsoft Protective Gear; Airsoft Targets
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Caccia e tiro a segno > Airsoft: Granate da softair; Parti di ricambio e accessori pistole aria compressa; Pistole ad aria compressa; Pallini per aria compressa; Equipaggiamento protettivo per softair; Bersagli da softair
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 打猎与射击 > 软弹气枪: 软气手榴弹; 气枪零件/配件; 气枪; 气枪子弹; 软弹气枪护具; 软气枪靶
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Săn bắn > Súng hơi hạng nhẹ: Lựu đạn airsoft; Bộ phận & linh kiện súng hơi; Súng hơi; Đạn súng hơi hạng nhẹ; Thiết bị bảo vệ súng hơi hạng nhẹ; Bia bắn airsoft
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Охота и стрельба > Страйкбол: Страйкбольные гранаты; Детали и аксессуары для страйкбольного оружия; Страйкбольное оружие; Шарики для страйкбольного оружия; Защитная экипировка для страйкбола; Страйкбольные мишени
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Jagt og skydning > Airsoft: Airsoftgranater; Airsoftpistoldele og tilbehør; Airsoftpistoler; Airsoftkugler; Beskyttelsesudstyr til airsoft; Airsoftmål
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Caça e tiro > Airsoft: Granadas de airsoft; Acessórios e peças para armas de pressão; Armas de pressão; Balas de pressão; Equipamento de proteção para airsoft; Alvos de airsoft